Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Suits to Enforce Liens on Crops, Advances, Lumber, Timber, Foals, Calves and Water Craft

§ 85-7-31.
Commencement of suit.

A person having any lien in Sections 85-7-1 through 85-7-9 may enforce the same by making affidavit before any officer authorized to administer oaths of any county where the subject-matter of the lien may be, describing therein the property sought to be subjected, setting forth his claim, share or interest therein, and asserting his lien thereon, with an itemized account of his demand, and giving the names of the persons interested therein, and of those, if any, who have a like or other claim or interest in such property; whereupon the clerk or justice shall issue a writ directed to the proper officer and returnable to the proper court, commanding the officer to seize the property, or so much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy the plaintiff’s demand and costs, and to summon the persons named in the affidavit as interested therein, to appear in the court designated, at the time fixed, to answer the complaint.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 1363, 1364; 1892, § 2684; 1906, § 3044; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2402; 1930, § 2243; 1942, § 341.

§ 85-7-33.
Non-resident or unknown parties.

If any party in interest be a non-resident of the state, or his whereabouts be unknown, he may be made a party to the suit and be proceeded against as in case of suits by attachment against such persons.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1370; 1892, § 2690; 1906, § 3050; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2408; 1930, § 2244; 1942, § 342.

§ 85-7-35.
Precedents.

Affidavits and writs in the form of the following precedents shall be sufficient in cases of employer and employee, and in other cases the form shall vary so as to conform to the facts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1373; 1892, § 2693; 1906, § 3053; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2411; 1930, § 2245; 1942, § 343.

§ 85-7-37.
Affidavit.

“State of Mississippi, County “Before me, , a justice of the peace of the said county, makes oath that he was employed by during the year A. D. , as a laborer, and as such, and under his employment, assisted to make a crop of cotton and corn, which yielded bales of cotton and bushels of corn, which are now in the possession of , and the same is at , in said county; and that affiant is, by his contract and services, entitled to one-half of said cotton and corn, the same being of the value of dollars, which the said withholds from him [or whatever may be the claim]. Affiant claims a lien on all of said cotton and corn for the recovery of his share or interest therein, and that and claim a like lien thereon. Affiant prays process according to law. “ ” “Sworn to and subscribed before me, the day of , A. D. “, J. P.”

Click to view

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1374; 1892, § 2694; 1906, § 3054; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2412; 1930, § 2246; 1942, § 344.

§ 85-7-39.
Writ; form.

“The State of Mississippi. “To any lawful officer of county: “We command you forthwith to take into your possession and dispose of, according to law, bales of cotton and bushels of corn, now in the possession of , believed to be at , in your county, as it is said, or so much thereof as will be sufficient to satisfy the claim of , who asserts an interest therein to the extent of one-half thereof, which he avers is of the value of dollars [or who claims a lien thereon for dollars, alleged to be due him for his wages as a laborer in producing said articles, or whatever the claim may be, as set forth in the affidavit], for his labor in producing said articles, and summon the said [and any others shown by the affidavit to have an adverse claim to said articles] to appear before the undersigned, a justice of the peace of said county, at , on , the day of A. D. , at o’clock, .M., to answer said claim, and have this writ there then. “Witness my hand, the day of , A. D. . “, J. P.”

Click to view

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1375; 1892, § 2695; 1906, § 3055; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2413; 1930, § 2247; 1942, § 345.

§ 85-7-41.
Writ; where returnable.

The writ shall be returnable before the justice of the peace who issued it or some other justice of the peace, if the principal of the sum claimed does not exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), and, if it does, it shall be returnable to the circuit court; and in such case the affidavit shall be filed, by the officer who issued the writ, in the office of the clerk of the circuit court, on or before the return day of the writ.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1365; 1892, § 2685; 1906, § 3045; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2403; 1930, § 2248; 1942, § 346.

§ 85-7-43.
Writ; when returnable.

The writ, when returnable before a justice of the peace, may be made returnable at any time which will give the parties in interest five (5) days’ notice before trial; and when returnable to the circuit court, it may be executed at any time before the first day of the term, and the cause shall be triable at such term.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1366; 1892, § 2686; 1906, § 3046; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2404; 1930, § 2249; 1942, § 347.

§ 85-7-45.
Writ; return to wrong court not to affect the case.

If the writ be made returnable to the wrong court, the case shall not be dismissed nor affected thereby, but shall be transferred to the proper court, and the cause shall be there proceeded with as if the writ had been made returnable there; and any bond given shall not be affected by such mistake, but it may be proceeded on in the proper court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1367; 1892, § 2687; 1906, § 3047; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2405; 1930, § 2250; 1942, § 348.

§ 85-7-47.
Replevy of property seized.

The defendant, or any person interested, may give bond, with sufficient sureties, and replevy the property seized, as provided in the action of replevin; and the rights of the parties respectively to give such bond and receive the property from the officer, and the condition of the bond, the necessary changes being made, and the duty of the officer to take it and his liability thereon, and the disposition he shall make of the property if bond be not given, and the proceeding on such bond, shall be as provided for in the like case in the action of replevin; and any bond given shall inure to the person in whose favor judgment may be given in the case, as if it were payable to him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1368; 1892, § 2688; 1906, § 3048; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2406; 1930, § 2251; 1942, § 349.

§ 85-7-49.
Issue and judgment.

Any person interested may contest the demand of the plaintiff on the return day of the writ, if returned, or on any day before the rendition of final judgment in the case, by filing a statement in writing, under oath, of his defense or claim, itemizing his account, if any he has; and the case shall be then at issue between the parties, and shall be tried as other cases in the court. And the judgment of the court shall be framed so as to adjust the rights of the several parties as to the subject-matter of the suit; and judgment may be given against the party liable thereto for any amount, and for the sale of any goods in the hands of the officer, and for any balance not obtained from the sale of the goods, to be made by execution as in other cases, and the costs may be adjudged as the court may consider just; and as many judgments shall be rendered as may be necessary to adjust the rights of the several parties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1369; 1892, § 2689; 1906, § 3049; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2407; 1930, § 2252; 1942, § 350.

§ 85-7-51.
Death of party not to abate suit.

If any party to the suit die, it shall not abate, but may be proceeded with as in other personal actions in such case; and if any party thereto die after judgment, the same may be executed and enforced as judgments in other personal actions in such case.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1370; 1892, § 2691; 1906, § 3051; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2409; 1930, § 2253; 1942, § 351.

§ 85-7-53.
Sale of steamboat or water craft and its effect.

If the special writ of execution be for the sale of a steamboat or other water craft, the officer shall levy on, advertise and sell the same as personal property too cumbersome to be moved is levied on and sold for debt; and the purchaser shall acquire the same free from all prior encumbrances saving the rights of those having concurrent liens under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2711; 1906, § 3071; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2431; 1930, § 2254; 1942, § 352.